output.aff
SFX R   iast        adte       priast
SFX R   st          dol        priast
SFX R   st          dla        priast
SFX R   st          dlo        priast
SFX R   st          dli        priast
SFX R   iast        asiem      triast
SFX R   iast        asies      triast
SFX R   iast        asie       triast
SFX R   iast        asieme     triast
SFX R   iast        asiete     triast
SFX R   iast        asu        triast
SFX R   iast        asuc       triast
SFX R   iast        as         triast
SFX R   iast        asme       triast
SFX R   iast        aste       triast
SFX R   st          sol        triast
SFX R   st          sla        triast
SFX R   st          slo        triast
SFX R   st          sli        triast
SFX R   iest        esiem      niest
SFX R   iest        esies      niest
SFX R   iest        esie       niest
SFX R   iest        esieme     niest
SFX R   iest        esiete     niest
SFX R   iest        esu        niest
SFX R   iest        esuc       niest
SFX R   iest        es         niest
SFX R   iest        esme       niest
SFX R   iest        este       niest
SFX R   st          sol        niest
SFX R   st          sla        niest
SFX R   st          slo        niest
SFX R   st          sli        niest
SFX R   iest        ediem      viest
SFX R   iest        edies      viest
SFX R   iest        edie       viest
SFX R   iest        edieme     viest
SFX R   iest        ediete     viest
SFX R   iest        edu        viest
SFX R   iest        educ       viest
SFX R   iest        ed         viest
SFX R   iest        edme       viest
SFX R   iest        edte       viest
SFX R   st          dol        viest
SFX R   st          dla        viest
SFX R   st          dlo        viest
SFX R   st          dli        viest
SFX R   iest        etiem      [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        eties      [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        etie       [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        etieme     [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        etiete     [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        etu        [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        etuc       [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        et         [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        etme       [^nv]iest
SFX R   iest        ette       [^nv]iest
SFX R   st          tol        [^nv]iest
SFX R   st          tla        [^nv]iest
SFX R   st          tlo        [^nv]iest
SFX R   st          tli        [^nv]iest
SFX R   st          m          [^i]est
SFX R   st          s          [^i]est
SFX R   est         e          [^i]est
SFX R   st          me         [^i]est
SFX R   st          te         [^i]est
SFX R   st          dia        [^i]est
SFX R   st          diac       [^i]est
SFX R   st          dz         [^i]est
SFX R   st          dzme       [^i]est
SFX R   st          dzte       [^i]est
SFX R   st          dol        [^i]est
SFX R   st          dla        [^i]est
SFX R   st          dlo        [^i]est
SFX R   st          dli        [^i]est
SFX R   st          dem        .[ij]st
SFX R   st          des        .[ij]st
SFX R   st          de         .[ij]st
SFX R   st          deme       .[ij]st
SFX R   st          dete       .[ij]st
SFX R   st          du         .[ij]st
SFX R   st          duc        .[ij]st
SFX R   st          d          .ist
SFX R   st          dme        .ist
SFX R   st          dte        .ist
SFX R   ist         isiel      ist
SFX R   ist         isla       ist
SFX R   ist         islo       ist
SFX R   ist         isli       ist
SFX R   st          di         ajst
SFX R   st          dimme      ajst
SFX R   st          dite       ajst
SFX R   ajst        asiel      ajst
SFX R   ajst        asla       ajst
SFX R   ajst        aslo       ajst
SFX R   ajst        asli       ajst
SFX R   ojst        osiel      ojst
SFX R   ojst        osla       ojst
SFX R   ojst        oslo       ojst
SFX R   ojst        osli       ojst
SFX R   jst         siel       jst
SFX R   jst         sla        jst
SFX R   jst         slo        jst
SFX R   jst         sli        jst
SFX R   ust         udiem      ust
SFX R   ust         udies      ust
SFX R   ust         udie       ust
SFX R   ust         udieme     ust
SFX R   ust         udiete     ust
SFX R   ust         udu        ust
SFX R   ust         uduc       ust
SFX R   ust         ud         ust
SFX R   ust         udme       ust
SFX R   ust         udte       ust
SFX R   st          dol        ust
SFX R   st          dla        ust
SFX R   st          dlo        ust
SFX R   st          dli        ust
SFX R   nut         niem       nut
SFX R   nut         nies       nut
SFX R   nut         nie        nut
SFX R   nut         nieme      nut
SFX R   nut         niete      nut
SFX R   nut         nu         nut
SFX R   nut         nuc        nut
SFX R   nut         n          nut
SFX R   nut         nme        nut
SFX R   nut         nte        nut
SFX R   nut         nul        nut
SFX R   nut         nula       nut
SFX R   nut         nulo       nut
SFX R   nut         nuli       nut
SFX R   iezt        eziem      riezt
SFX R   iezt        ezies      riezt
SFX R   iezt        ezie       riezt
SFX R   iezt        ezieme     riezt
SFX R   iezt        eziete     riezt
SFX R   iezt        ezu        riezt
SFX R   iezt        ezuc       riezt
SFX R   iezt        ez         riezt
SFX R   iezt        ezme       riezt
SFX R   iezt        ezte       riezt
SFX R   iezt        eziem      [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ezies      [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ezie       [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ezieme     [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        eziete     [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ezu        [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ezuc       [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ez         [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ezme       [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        ezte       [^r]iezt
SFX R   t           ol         [^r]iezt
SFX R   t           la         [^r]iezt
SFX R   t           lo         [^r]iezt
SFX R   t           li         [^r]iezt
SFX R   iezt        iem        [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        ies        [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        ie         [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        eme        [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        ete        [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        u          [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        uc         [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        z          [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        me         [^i]ezt
SFX R   iezt        te         [^i]ezt
SFX R   t           ol         [^i]ezt
SFX R   t           la         [^i]ezt
SFX R   t           lo         [^i]ezt
SFX R   t           li         [^i]ezt
SFX R   t           iem        [^e]zt
SFX R   t           ies        [^e]zt
SFX R   t           ie         [^e]zt
SFX R   t           ieme       [^e]zt
SFX R   t           iete       [^e]zt
SFX R   t           u          [^e]zt
SFX R   t           uc         [^e]zt
SFX R   zt          z          [^e]zt
SFX R   t           me         [^e]zt
SFX R   t           te         [^e]zt
SFX R   t           ol         [^e]zt
SFX R   t           la         [^e]zt
SFX R   t           lo         [^e]zt
SFX R   t           li         [^e]zt

REP 48
REP a a
REP a a
REP a a
REP a a
REP aa a
REP c c
REP c c
REP d d
REP d d
REP e e
REP e e
REP i i
REP i i
REP i u
REP i y
REP l l
REP l l
REP l s
REP m n
REP n m
REP n n
REP n n
REP o o
REP o o
REP o o
REP o o
REP r r
REP r r
REP sla las
REP s s
REP s l
REP s s
REP t t
REP t t
REP u i
REP u u
REP u u
REP u z
REP v w
REP w v
REP y i
REP y y
REP y y
REP y z
REP z u
REP z y
REP z z
REP z z
