output.dic
becat/NR
lezat/NR
miest/NR
mlcat/NR
mnaucat/NR
mraucat/NR
mrziet/NR
mysliet/NR
nadist/NR
nadniest/NR
nadrat/NR
najest/NR
naklast/NR
naletiet/NR
nalezat/NR
namliet/NR
naniest/NR
napast/NR
napomenut/NR
naprsat/NR
narast/NR
nasrat/NR
natlct/NR
naviest/NR
navinut/NR
navraviet/NR
nenavidiet/NR
obdrat/NR
obhoriet/NR
objest/NR
obletiet/NR
obliect/NRX
obrast/NR
obsediet/NR
obvinut/NR
odfrcat/NR
odist/NR
odletiet/NR
odmlcat/NR
odniest/NR
odospat/NR
odpomoct/NR
odrat/NRT
odsediet/NR
odviest/NR
odvinut/NR
odvraviet/NR
omiest/NR
omrziet/NR
oprat/NR
oprsat/NR
osinut/NR
otriast/NR
ozrat/NR
past/NR
pistat/NR
plustat/NR
podist/NR
podliezt/NR
podniest/NR
podomliet/NR
podrat/NR
podrzat/NR
podviest/NR
podzrat/NR
pojest/NR
poklast/NR
polezat/NR
pominut/NR
pomliet/NR
pomysliet/NR
popast/NR
porast/NR
pospat/NR
posunut/NR
postat/NR
potriast/NR
povliect/NR
povrtiet/NR
pozrat/NR
prat/NR
preboliet/NR
predist/NR
predrat/NR
predviest/NR
prehoriet/NR
prejest/NR
prekricat/NR
preletiet/NR
preliezt/NR
premliet/NR
premysliet/NR
preobliect/NR
prepast/NR
preprat/NR
preriect/NR
prespat/NR
pretlct/NR
pretrpiet/NR
previezt/NR
prevliect/NR
prezliect/NR
prezrat/NR
pribrat/NR
prihoriet/NR
priliezt/NR
primysliet/NR
priniest/NR
pripiect/NR
prirast/NR
prist/NR
pritlct/NR
priviezt/NR
privliect/NR
prsat/NR
rapcat/NR
riect/NR
rinut/NR
rozhladiet/NR
rozhrmiet/NR
rozhucat/NR
rozjest/NR
rozletiet/NR
rozliezt/NR
rozmliet/NR
rozmysliet/NR
rozobrat/NR
rozomliet/NR
rozozvucat/NR
rozpliest/NR
rozpriast/NR
rozpucat/NR
rozsediet/NR
roztiect/NR
roztriast/NR
rozviezt/NR
rozvliect/NR
rozvrtiet/NR
rozzrat/NR
rycat/NR
schrapcat/NR
sipiet/NR
skrvaviet/NR
slusat/NR
spat/NR
spliest/NR
spomenut/NR
sprastat/NR
spriast/NR
srsat/NR
stlct/NR
striezt/NR
suvisiet/NR
svistat/NR
sycat/NR
skrcat/NR
skvrcat/NR
sumiet/NR
sustat/NR
tlct/NR
trestat/NR
trpiet/NR
udychcat/NR
uletiet/NR
umlcat/NR
upiect/NR
upriast/NR
usviedcat/NR
utlct/NR
uvidiet/NR
uviezt/NR
vaziet/NR
vediet/NR
viest/NR
vinut/NR
vletiet/NR
vliezt/NR
vmysliet/NR
vodrat/NR
voviest/NR
vpliest/NR
vraviet/NR
vrestat/NR
vrtiet/NR
vtiect/NR
vybrat/NR
vydrzat/NR
vyhoriet/NR
vyhryzt/NR
vyjst/NR
vykricat/NR
vyletiet/NR
vyliezt/NR
vymliet/NR
vymysliet/NR
vyniest/NR
vypast/NR
vypliest/NR
vyprat/NR
vyprsat/NR
vyrast/NR
vysediet/NR
vyspat/NR
vysinut/NR
vytiect/NR
vytrpiet/NR
vyviezt/NR
vyvliect/NR
vyzliect/NR
vyzrat/NR
vzkypiet/NR
vzniest/NR
vzrat/NR
zablystat/NR
zabrat/NR
zabzucat/NR
zadrncat/NR
zaduniet/NR
zaerdzat/NR
zafucat/NR
zahoriet/NR
zahrmiet/NR
zahust/NR
zachrapcat/NR
zachripiet/NR
zachrupstat/NR
zajest/NR
zajst/NR
zakricat/NR
zaletiet/NR
zaliezt/NR
zamiest/NR
zamnaucat/NR
zamravcat/NR
zamrziet/NR
zaniest/NR
zaobliect/NR
zapiect/NR
zapliest/NR
zaprat/NR
zapustat/NRX
zarast/NR
zarincat/NR
zarycat/NR
zaskucat/NR
zasmrdiet/NR
zasvistat/NR
zasycat/NR
zaskripiet/NR
zasumiet/NR
zatlct/NR
zatriast/NR
zaviest/NR
zavinut/NR
zavliect/NR
zavrcat/NR
zavrtiet/ENR
zazrat/NR
zdrat/NR
zhoriet/NR
zhrmiet/NR
zist/NR
zjest/NR
zletiet/NR
zmiast/NR
zmliet/NR
zmysliet/NR
znevidiet/NR
zobliect/NR
zodrat/NR
zorat/NR
zosinut/NR
zrast/NR
zrincat/NR
zrycat/NR
zvediet/NR
zviest/NR
zvliect/NR
zvucat/NR
